Kentucky statutes. TITLE IV Judicial Branch
Judges

26A.015.
Disqualification of justice or judge of the Court of Justice, or master commissioner.

For the purposes of this section the following words or phrases shall have the meaning indicated:

“Proceeding” includes pretrial, trial, appellate review, or other stages of litigation;

“Fiduciary” includes such relationships as executor, administrator, conservator, trustee, and guardian;

“Financial interest” means ownership of a legal or equitable interest, however small, or a relationship as director, adviser, or other active participant in the affairs of a party, except that:

Ownership in a mutual or common investment fund that holds securities, or a proprietary interest of a policyholder in a mutual insurance company, of a depositor in a mutual savings association, or a similar proprietary interest, or ownership of government securities is a “financial interest” only if the outcome of the proceeding could substantially affect the value of the interest;

An office in an educational, religious, charitable, fraternal, or civic organization is not a “financial interest” in securities held by the organization.

Any justice or judge of the Court of Justice or master commissioner shall disqualify himself in any proceeding:

Where he has a personal bias or prejudice concerning a party, or personal knowledge of disputed evidentiary facts concerning the proceedings, or has expressed an opinion concerning the merits of the proceeding;

Where in private practice or government service he served as a lawyer or rendered a legal opinion in the matter in controversy, or a lawyer with whom he previously practiced law served during such association as a lawyer concerning the matter in controversy, or the judge, master commissioner or such lawyer has been a material witness concerning the matter in controversy;

Where he knows that he, individually or as a fiduciary, or his spouse or minor child residing in his household, has a pecuniary or proprietary interest in the subject matter in controversy or in a party to the proceeding;

Where he or his spouse, or a person within the third degree of relationship to either of them, or the spouse of such a person:

Is a party to the proceeding, or an officer, director, or trustee of a party;

Is acting as a lawyer in the proceeding and the disqualification is not waived by stipulation of counsel in the proceeding filed therein;

Is known by the judge or master commissioner to have an interest that could be substantially affected by the outcome of the proceeding;

Is to the knowledge of the judge or master commissioner likely to be a material witness in the proceeding.

Where he has knowledge of any other circumstances in which his impartiality might reasonably be questioned.

Any justice or judge of the Court of Justice disqualified under the provisions of this section shall be replaced by the Chief Justice.

Any master commissioner disqualified under the provisions of this section or unable to discharge the duties of his office for any other reason shall be replaced by a special commissioner who shall be appointed by the judge of the court before whom the action is pending. The special commissioner shall meet the same qualifications as a master commissioner and shall take an oath and execute a bond as the regular commissioner is required to do.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 22, § 4; 1982, ch. 141, § 41, effective July 1, 1982.

26A.020.
Designation of retired justice or judge as special judge.

When, from any cause, a judge of any Circuit or District Court fails to attend, or being in attendance cannot properly preside in an action pending in the court, or if a vacancy occurs or exists in the office of circuit or district judge, the circuit clerk shall at once certify the facts to the Chief Justice who shall immediately designate a regular or retired justice or judge of the Court of Justice as special judge. If either party files with the circuit clerk his affidavit that the judge will not afford him a fair and impartial trial, or will not impartially decide an application for a change of venue, the circuit clerk shall at once certify the facts to the Chief Justice who shall immediately review the facts and determine whether to designate a regular or retired justice or judge of the Court of Justice as special judge. Any special judge so selected shall have all the powers and responsibilities of a regular judge of the court.

A retired justice or judge serving as a special judge shall be compensated as provided by KRS

21A.110

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 22, § 5.

26A.030.
Successor of judge may sign orders.

Upon the death of a judge, or when from any cause the office is vacant, or when the judge is absent, his replacement or successor, no matter how chosen, may sign any orders of court left unsigned by his predecessor, the same as his predecessor might have done.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 22, § 6.

26A.040.
Proceedings in court having divisions.

Proceedings in any court having divisions shall be valid when prosecuted in any division thereof.

Any judge presiding over a division of a court mentioned in subsection (1) may hear and determine any case or question in any other division.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 22, § 3, effective January 2, 1978.

26A.080.
Judicial officer to report unprofessional conduct of justice, judge, or attorney.

When it comes to the attention of any judicial officer that any justice or judge of the Court of Justice or any attorney may have been guilty of unprofessional conduct, he shall at once report the matter to the proper investigating and disciplinary authorities.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 18, § 1.